New York, session 2025-2026, A1846.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 131-a of the social services law, 2 as amended by section 12 of part B of chapter 436 of the laws of 1997, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 1. Any inconsistent provision of this chapter or other law notwith- 5 standing, social services officials shall, in accordance with the 6 provisions of this section and regulations of the department, provide 7 public assistance to needy persons who constitute or are members of a 8 family household, who are determined to be eligible in accordance with 9 standards of need established in subdivision two of this section. 10 Provision for such persons, for all items of need, less any available 11 income or resources which are not required to be disregarded by other 12 provisions of this chapter, shall be made in accordance with this 13 section. Such provision shall be made in monthly or semi-monthly allow- 14 ances and grants within the limits of the schedules included in subdivi- 15 sion three of this section except for additional amounts which shall be 16 included therein for shelter, fuel for heating, home internet service, 17 additional cost of meals for persons who are unable to prepare meals at 18 home and for other items for which specific provision is otherwise made 19 in this article [five]. As used in this section the term "shelter" may 20 include a grant not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars toward 21 the purchase of an interest in a cooperative. A social services official 22 shall require assignment of recipient's equity in such cooperative hous- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04675-01-5 A. 1846 2 1 ing in accordance with the rules of the board and regulations of the 2 department. 3 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 131-a of the social 4 services law, as amended by chapter 87 of the laws of 1993, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 (b) In addition to the above, the standard of need shall include 7 amounts for shelter and fuel for heating, amounts for home energy 8 payments (including amounts for supplemental home energy grants), 9 amounts for home internet service payments, amounts for additional cost 10 of meals for persons who are unable to prepare meals at home and amounts 11 for other items when required by individual case circumstances for which 12 specific provision is otherwise made in this article [five of this chap- 13 ter]. For purposes of determining the amount to be included in the stan- 14 dard of need for shelter and fuel for heating, to the extent that feder- 15 al reimbursement is available therefor, social services officials shall 16 include in the household any child who has entered foster care pursuant 17 to section three hundred eighty-four-a of this chapter who was eligible 18 for and in receipt of assistance and care as a member of the household 19 in and for the month of entry into foster care and for whom the family 20 service plan, as defined in section four hundred nine-e of this chapter, 21 includes a goal of discharge to a member of the household. 22 § 3. Section 131-a of the social services law is amended by adding two 23 new subdivisions 3-e and 6 to read as follows: 24 3-e. Commencing January first, two thousand twenty-six, for persons 25 and families determined to be eligible by the application of the stand- 26 ard of need prescribed by the provisions of subdivision two of this 27 section, shall receive a home internet service grant equal to an amount 28 which shall be determined by the department as sufficient to provide for 29 home internet service for such persons and families. 30 6. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or other law, 31 a social services official shall make provisions for the purchase of an 32 internet-enabled device for the home of a person in need of public 33 assistance, provided provision therefor cannot otherwise be made. 34 § 4. Section 461-c of the social services law is amended by adding a 35 new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 36 10. Adult care facilities subject to the provisions of this title 37 shall provide residents of such facilities with access to internet-ena- 38 bled devices and internet service. 39 § 5. Section 462 of the social services law is amended by adding a new 40 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 41 3. Child care facilities subject to the provisions of this title shall 42 provide residents of such facilities with access to internet-enabled 43 devices and internet service. 44 § 6. Section 459-b of the social services law, as amended by chapter 7 45 of the laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 46 § 459-b. Residential services for victims of domestic violence. 1. In 47 accordance with section one hundred thirty-one-u of this chapter and the 48 regulations of the office of children and family services, a social 49 services district shall offer and provide necessary and available emer- 50 gency shelter and services for up to ninety days at a residential 51 program for victims of domestic violence to a victim of domestic 52 violence who was residing in the social services district at the time of 53 the alleged domestic violence whether or not such victim is eligible for 54 public assistance. Two forty-five day extensions of necessary and avail- 55 able emergency shelter may be granted beyond the maximum length of stay 56 at a residential program for victims of domestic violence for residents A. 1846 3 1 who continue to be in need of emergency services and temporary shelter. 2 If the victim of domestic violence has a service animal as such term is 3 defined in section one hundred twenty-three-b of the agriculture and 4 markets law, or therapy dog as such term is defined in section one 5 hundred eight of the agriculture and markets law, respectively, such 6 service animal or therapy dog shall be allowed to accompany the victim 7 at the residential program authorized pursuant to this section, so long 8 as such accompaniment would not create an undue burden as defined by 9 section two hundred ninety-six of the executive law. 10 2. Where such accompaniment would constitute an undue burden, the 11 residential program shall make reasonable efforts to facilitate place- 12 ment of such animal at an off-site animal care facility or if reasonable 13 efforts fail, provide referral to one or more off-site animal care 14 facilities. Such off-site animal care may include, but not be limited 15 to, boarding at a veterinary hospital or under the auspices of a duly 16 incorporated humane society, or duly incorporated animal protection 17 association approved for such purpose by the department of agriculture 18 and markets. 19 3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any rights or 20 obligations provided pursuant to federal or state law, including but not 21 limited to providing reasonable accommodations for individuals with 22 disabilities. 23 4. Residential programs for victims of domestic violence shall provide 24 access to internet-enabled devices and internet service to residents of 25 such facilities. 26 § 7. Subdivision 38 of section 2 of the social services law is amended 27 by adding a new paragraph (f) to read as follows: 28 (f) "Internet-enabled device" means any hardware technology including, 29 but not limited to, a cellular telephone, computer, or tablet device 30 that is capable of providing wireless or wireline internet access. 31 § 8. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 32 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 33 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 34 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 35 on or before such effective date.